Hawaii statutes.
§142-7 Breeding in quarantine prohibited.
The use of any animal for breeding purposes while the animal is quarantined is
prohibited, except that the department of agriculture may, with the written
permission of the owner and under rules adopted by the department, permit the
collection of semen from the male animal or the artificial insemination of the
female animal while in quarantine by a licensed veterinarian under the
supervision of an agent of the department. [L 1935, c 32, §§1, 2; RL 1945,
§1058; RL 1955, §20-8; HRS §142-7; am L 1969, c 35, §1; am L 1986, c 5, §1]

Attorney General Opinions

Includes artificial
insemination during the quarantine period. Att. Gen. Op. 66-13.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next